California, session 20252026, AB1612.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11451 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:11451. (a)The Department of Justice may, upon an appropriation by the Legislature, contract with a third party to dispose of all controlled substances received from a local police department, sheriff’s office, or state law enforcement agency, pursuant to subdivision (b). As used in this section, “controlled substances” has the same meaning as defined in the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act, pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000). shall, upon an appropriation by the Legislature, and in consultation with the Department of Toxic Substances Control and other relevant state and local agencies, develop and publish guidance, on the Department of Justice’s internet website, for proper management and disposal of controlled substances in the possession of a local police department, sheriff’s office, or state law enforcement agency.(b)A local police department, sheriff’s office, or state law enforcement agency in possession of a controlled substance may, if the controlled substance has been held beyond the applicable retention period for an ongoing investigation or related proceedings and they are otherwise authorized by law to destroy the controlled substance, transport the controlled substance to the Department of Justice for disposal.(c)The Department of Justice shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.